Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 6

Fees

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

21-6-101. Fees in certain sections superseded.

The appropriate fee prescribed in §§21-6-306,21-6-402, and21-6-403 shall be in lieu of the fee prescribed in:

Section 18-44-117 for filing mechanics' and materialmen's liens;

Section 18-46-115 for filing medical, nursing, and hospital liens;

Section 16-65-117 for filing judgments to establish judgment liens on lands; and

Section 17-90-303 for recording licenses of optometrists.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Section 17-90-303 does not prescribe a fee for recording licenses of optometrists.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 333, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1720.2.

21-6-102. Posting of fees.

Every officer to whom fees are allowed by law shall cause to be set up in some conspicuous place in his or her office and there constantly keep a fair list or table of his or her fees. In case of default, any such officer shall forfeit all the fees pertaining to his or her office so long as he or she shall neglect to set up and keep up the list or table of fees.

History.

Acts Dec. 23, 1842, § 26, p. 27; C. & M. Dig., § 4626; Pope's Dig., § 5715; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1737.

21-6-103. Illegal fees — Penalty.

If any officer shall charge, demand, or receive any more or greater fees for his or her services than are allowed by law, or shall demand, charge, or receive any such fees without having performed the services for which the fees are charged, the officer for every offense shall forfeit to the injured party, or the party against whom the fees may be charged, the amount of fees illegally charged, and five dollars ($5.00) for each item illegally demanded, charged, or received, with cost, and shall also be subject to an indictment for extortion.

History.

Acts Dec. 23, 1842, § 35, p. 27; C. & M. Dig., §§ 2810, 4632; Pope's Dig., §§ 3528, 5721; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1738.

Publisher's Notes. This section may be partially superseded, as it relates to notaries public, by §21-6-309(b).

Cross References. Soliciting unlawful compensation, §5-52-104.

21-6-104. Fees in absence of fixed fee.

In all cases where any officer or other person is required to perform any duty for which no fees are allowed by any law, he or she shall be entitled to receive such pay as would be allowed for similar services.

History.

Acts Dec. 23, 1842, § 24, p. 27; C. & M. Dig., § 4624; Pope's Dig., § 5713; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1735.

Cross References. Constructive fees not allowed, §14-23-108.

21-6-105. Computation of fees.

In all cases where fees are allowed by law according to the number of words, each figure shall be counted as one (1) word.

History.

Acts Dec. 23, 1842, § 23, p. 27; C. & M. Dig., § 4623; Pope's Dig., § 5712; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1734.

Subchapter 2

— State Officers

Effective Dates. Acts 1875, No. 77, § 53: effective on passage.

Acts 1881, No. 40, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1927, No. 197, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1983, No. 886, § 6: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1983 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1983 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1985, No. 318, § 2: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fifth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this Act is essential to the efficient operation of the State Land Department and any delay in the implementation of this Act will seriously hamper the efficient operation of the State Land Department. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of public peace and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 2001, No. 423, § 2: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that the effective date of this act shall be July 1, 2001, in that the fiscal year for all state agencies begins on July 1; that for purposes of accounting and record keeping it is necessary that the changes made by this act to the collection of fees by the Commissioner of State Lands be implemented on a date corresponding with the start of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

21-6-201. Auditor of State.

The following fee shall be paid into the State Treasury for services performed by the Auditor of State:

For each certified transcript from the Auditor of State, to be paid by the person who shall desire the same$ 1.00

History.

Acts 1875, No. 77, § 2, p. 167; C. & M. Dig., § 4569; Pope's Dig., § 5653; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1702.

21-6-202. Secretary of State.

The following fees shall be allowed for services performed by the Secretary of State and paid into the State Treasury in the same manner that all other fees are or shall be directed to be paid:

For affixing the Great Seal of the State, or the Seal of the Secretary of State to any instrument$ 5.00

For every commission issued to a citizen of another state or apostilles10.00

For every commission issued to a state officer other than prosecuting attorneys15.00

For every commission issued to prosecuting attorneys15.00

For every commission issued to a sheriff, collector, clerk, county judge, treasurer, assessor, coroner, or surveyor10.00

For every commission issued to any other county officer or justice of the peace other than members of the General Assembly5.00

For all copies of records or other written or printed files in the office of the Secretary of State, and for recording, for everypage .80

For all copies of maps, profiles, or other files of a similar nature, such fee as may be established by the Secretary of State, to be determined with reference to the amount of clerical labor and stationery required to make such copies, at the rate of not less than one dollar ($1.00) per hour for the time employed in making the copies.

All fees specified in this section shall be paid at the time the commission, certificate, instrument, or copy is delivered.

A special judge of the Supreme Court is not required to pay the fee for a commission issued to a state officer. Chism v. Martin, 57 Ark. 83, 20 S.W. 809 (1892).

Establish a schedule of rates, fees, and charges for the deeds produced and filed or services performed in carrying out the established duties and authority of the office of the Commissioner of State Lands; and

Revise the rates, fees, and charges to ensure that the revenues from the rates, fees, and charges together with other available funds shall be sufficient to cover the costs of the various deeds produced or filed and services performed in carrying out the established duties and authority of the office of the Commissioner of State Lands.

All rates, fees, and charges collected by the Commissioner of State Lands shall be deposited into a financial institution in the state.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment substituted “office of the Commissioner of State Lands” for “Office of the State Land Commissioner” in (a)(10); in (b), substituted “The commissioner shall” for “The Commissioner shall,” substituted “collection fee of twenty-five ($25.00) dollars” for “twenty-five dollar ($25.00) collection fee,” deleted “which has been transferred to the Commissioner of State Lands” following “delinquent land,” and inserted the present language following “delinquent land”; substituted “commissioner” for “Commissioner of State Lands” in (c), (d), and (e); substituted “a fee” for “into the State Treasury the sum” in (c) and (d); and substituted “a financial institution in the state” for “the State Treasury to the credit of the Constitutional Officers Fund” in (e).

The 2019 amendment rewrote the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 1875, No. 77, § 53: effective on passage.

Acts 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 58, § 15: effective on passage.

Acts 1883, No. 114, § 226: effective on passage.

Acts 1885, No. 97, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1885, No. 98, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1899, No. 190, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1903, No. 32, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1921, No. 224, § 3: approved Mar. 3, 1921. Emergency clause provided: “This act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared, and this act shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1923, No. 142, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1929, No. 95, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1941, No. 78, § 2: approved Feb. 20, 1941. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the uncertainty of the law governing county treasurers' fees in this State is causing great confusion in our county governments and is endangering the public peace and safety, an emergency is therefore declared and this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1941, No. 120, § 2: approved Mar. 6, 1941. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined that on account of reduced assessed valuation and other reasons, additional compensation to collectors is necessary for proper enforcement of the law and collection of taxes; therefore an emergency exists and this act being necessary for the public peace, health and safety shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1943, No. 31, § 3: approved Feb. 10, 1943. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined that on account of reduced assessed valuation and other reasons, additional compensation to collectors is necessary for proper enforcement of the law and collection of taxes, therefore, an emergency exists and this act being necessary for the public peace, health and safety shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1945, No. 55, § 3: Feb. 16, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “All laws and parts of laws in conflict herewith are hereby repealed, and because of the confusion and uncertainty existing in the various counties throughout the State under the present laws relative to the legal fees entitled to be charged by the Circuit and Chancery Clerks and Recorders in this State for the services they render, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1945, No. 271, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1947, No. 201, § 3: Mar. 7, 1947. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the present fees now being paid to county surveyors are inadequate:

“Now, Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1947, No. 221, § 4: Mar. 18, 1947. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the fees now being paid to justices of the peace and constables of this State are totally inadequate to compensate them for the services rendered; now, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1949, No. 348, § 3: approved Mar. 21, 1949. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby ascertained that the commissions payable to the Collector are inadequate due to the increased cost of living and that a great hardship is being imposed; it being further ascertained that adequate compensation is necessary for the carrying on of county government and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety of the inhabitants of the State of Arkansas, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1963, No. 124, § 2: Feb. 28, 1963. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the fee presently provided for recorders for recording, indexing and cross-indexing instruments of writing is not adequate to compensate such recorders and in fact is working a severe hardship on the recorders in the various counties and that this act is immediately necessary to correct the situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 141, § 2: Jan. 1, 1974.

Acts 1975, No. 127, § 7: Feb. 7, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and determined by the General Assembly that the adoption of Amendment No. 55 to the Constitution requires legislation to implement immediately Section 5 of said Amendment; that standards for the payment of compensation of county officers and employees are required; and that requirements for receipt and deposit of fees, fines, and penalties consistent with said Amendment are required. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 333, § 6: Mar. 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the establishment of uniform advance fees to be charged for causes of action by the clerks in the various circuit and chancery courts of this State is necessary to provide for the efficient operation of said offices and to minimize the necessity of maintaining separate accounts for various fees; that the fees charged by county recorders are not now adequate to reimburse the county for the service of recording instruments, and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to promote the efficient administration of justice in this State and to enable counties to recover reasonable fees for services rendered by recorders. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 399, § 3: approved Mar. 10, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the operations of industries and inflationary activities have caused a great increase in wages and a great influx into this State, which has resulted in a congestion of population in many areas, which congestion has brought about more lawlessness and has necessitated a great deal of additional expense and work by the several Sheriffs of this State, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the same shall take effect and be in full force and effect after its passage.”

Acts 1985, No. 558, § 4: Mar. 25, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law is not clear with regard to the right of a county treasurer to receive a commission on public school funds handled by him for a district which is not administered in his county; that in some counties of the State both the county treasurer in which school funds are collected and the county treasurer of the county in which the district is administered are taking a full commission on such school funds; that the county treasurer of the county in which funds are collected but in which the school district is not administered actually performs very little service to the district; that to allow treasurers of two counties to take a commission on any particular public school funds places an unfair burden on such funds and on the districts for which such funds are collected; that it is the purpose and intent of this Act to clarify the law to assure that in the case of a school district located in two or more counties, only the county treasurer of the county in which the district is administered is entitled to a commission on the funds of such district and that this Act should be given effect at the earliest possible date to avoid this inequity. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 304, § 6: Mar. 2, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the fees currently prescribed by law to be charged by notaries for their services are outdated and are not sufficient to compensate notaries public for their services; that the current laws relating to notaries public do not require applicants for a notary commission to post a bond to assure that they perform their duties as a notary in accordance with law; that this act is designed to increase fees for notary services and to require notaries to file a bond at the time of making application for a notary commission and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 534, § 10: Mar. 14, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the fees currently charged for filing and recording instruments for initiation of actions in the circuit and chancery courts and for other official functions of the circuit and chancery courts are inadequate and should be increased immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1999, No. 108, § 5: Feb. 17, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that there is a lack of modern computerized accounting equipment and software in county treasurers' offices across the state. It is further determined by the Arkansas General Assembly that this lack of automation could impede the smooth operation of county finances in those counties without such equipment and software. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1215, § 2: March 30, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that due to the passage of Amendment 79 to the Constitution of Arkansas it is vital that the county collectors have the means to establish an automation system to ensure efficient and accurate records are kept by the county collector. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1275, § 4: Apr. 4, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that property tax reimbursements to the counties will most likely begin in April and it is critical to the counties to account for costs borne by the certification of amounts of real property tax reduction to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 741, § 6: Jan. 1, 2016.

Acts 1941, No. 342, provided that county delinquent tax collectors were to be paid from the fees they collected in their official capacity, but Acts 1975, No. 127, codified in this section as enabling legislation to Ark. Const. Amend. No. 55, provides that no county officers or employees shall be compensated through such a system; thus, Act 342 and Act 127 were plainly in direct conflict and the chancellor was correct in finding that Act 127 impliedly repealed Act 342. Bahil v. Scribner, 265 Ark. 834, 581 S.W.2d 334 (1979).

This section repealed Acts 1941, No. 342. Bahil v. Scribner, 265 Ark. 834, 581 S.W.2d 334 (1979).

Defendants were county officers or employees where the defendants conducted their operations out of the county courthouse, the county supplied their office space and utilities, their bonds were payable to the county, the county paid the employer's part of their Social Security payments, and the county paid the employer's part of their state retirement payments. Bahil v. Scribner, 265 Ark. 834, 581 S.W.2d 334 (1979).

Substantial evidence supported the finding of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees'Retirement System that former employees of nursing homes owned by counties were not “county employees” under the relevant statutes and were not eligible for membership in the retirement system because their compensation was payable from patient revenues rather than from appropriated funds.Bd. of Trs. of the Ark. Pub. Emples. Ret. Sys. v. Garrison, 2019 Ark. App. 245, 576 S.W.3d 485 (2019).

Assuming that the nursing-home administrative boards and their respective counties were synonymous under the definitions of “County employees” and “Employees” in §24-4-101, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees'Retirement System's finding that the former employees of county-owned nursing homes were not paid from appropriated funds as required by the definition of “Employees” in §24-4-101 was affirmed as no ordinances in the record specifically designated county money for their compensation.Bd. of Trs. of the Ark. Pub. Emples. Ret. Sys. v. Garrison, 2019 Ark. App. 245, 576 S.W.3d 485 (2019).

Requiring the collection of commissions from funds under this section provides for fair and equitable treatment of the entities on the books of the county;

The exceptions to the collection of commissions from funds are valid exceptions; and

The exceptions to the collection of county treasurer commissions under this section are the only valid exceptions.

The moneys collected by the treasurer as commissions shall be used by the treasurer to offset administrative costs.

The treasurer may set aside up to ten percent (10%) of the gross commissions collected annually to be credited to the county treasurer's automation fund to be used:

To operate the office of the county treasurer;

For administrative costs; and

To purchase, maintain, and operate an automated accounting and record-keeping system.

The acquisition and update of software for the automated accounting and record-keeping system are permitted uses of these funds.

Moneys deposited into the county treasurer's automation fund may accumulate and are not subject to the distribution of excess commission.

The moneys shall be appropriated and expended for the uses designated in this section by the quorum court at the direction of the treasurer.

The treasurer shall not receive a commission for the handling of revolving loan, equalizing, and vocational education funds, proceeds of school bond sales, money collected from insurance or risk management funds on losses, federal or state grants, funds the county treasurer is not statutorily or by ordinance authorized to manage, and nonrevenue receipts.

As used in this subsection, “nonrevenue receipts” means reimbursement of all or a part of a payment made by the county.

Except as provided in subdivision (g)(2) of this section, in the case of funds of a school district composed of area in two (2) or more counties, only the county treasurer of the county in which the district is administered shall be allowed a commission on the funds.

If the school district has a district treasurer, the county treasurer collecting the school district funds and remitting them to the district treasurer is allowed a commission on the funds of that school district in accordance with §§ 6-13-701 and 6-20-221.

Annual commissions not used for the operation of the county treasurer's office, except those commissions set aside in the county treasurer's automation fund, shall be prorated to the appropriate entities as excess commission.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The Arkansas Real Property Reappraisal Fund was originally codified as §§19-5-1096 and19-5-1207. However, to eliminate problems arising from the dual codification, §19-5-1207 was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 388, § 5.Accordingly, the amendment of §21-6-302 by Acts 2019, No. 310, which changed a reference in (b) from “§19-5-1096” to “§ 19-5-1207” has not been given effect.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment, in (a), inserted “by §§6-13-701,6-17-908,6-20-221,14-90-913, and21-6-104” and substituted “required to collect, as treasurer's commission,” for “allowed, as fees,”; added (b) through (d); redesignated former (b) and (c) as present (e) and (f); and inserted “school” in (e)(1).

The 2003 amendment inserted present (d)(1)(A) and (d)(1)(B); and inserted the (d)(1)(C) designation.

The 2005 amendment inserted “14-284-403” in (a).

The 2017 amendment inserted “Commission” and “Findings” in the section heading; added present (a); redesignated former (a) through (f) as present (b) through (g); substituted “Unless otherwise provided under subdivision (f)(1) or subsection (g) of this section or under §6-13-701, §6-17-908, §6-20-221, §8-15-111, §14-90-913, §14-174-109, §14-284-403, or §19-5-1096” for “Unless otherwise provided by §§6-13-701,6-17-908,6-20-221,14-90-913,14-284-403, and21-6-104” in (b); added “and are not subject to the distribution of excess commission” in (e)(3)(A); in (f)(1), inserted “or risk management funds” and “federal or state grants, funds the county treasurer is not statutorily or by ordinance authorized to manage”; added “Except as provided in subdivision (g)(2) of this section” in (g)(1); added (g)(2) and (h); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “§19-5-1207” for “§19-5-1096” in (b).

This section does not purport to be a salary act or other compensatory act for county treasurers, but it was intended to create a source of revenue accruing to that office from which the salary of the incumbent could be paid. Howard v. Stafford, 203 Ark. 736, 158 S.W.2d 929 (1942).

This section repealed Acts 1939, No. 146, but not any other act, either legislative or initiative, fixing the salaries of county treasurers. Howard v. Stafford, 203 Ark. 736, 158 S.W.2d 929 (1942).

This section contemplated the allowance of fees on all county revenue but not upon funds belonging to a drainage district. Honey v. Greene County, 102 Ark. 106, 143 S.W. 592 (1912) (decision under prior law).

The county treasurer's salary is fixed in amount by the total of the county funds coming into his hands, but in the settlement of the salary each fund contributes its own proportion and pays in its own kind. Hodges v. Prairie County, 80 Ark. 62, 95 S.W. 988 (1906) (decision under prior law).

The county treasurer is not entitled to a commission on sales of bonds of a drainage district. Fuller v. State, 112 Ark. 91, 164 S.W. 770 (1914) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1875, No. 77, § 1, p. 167; 1881, No. 40, § 1, p. 73; C. & M. Dig., § 4568; Acts 1927, No. 197, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 5652; Acts 1957, No. 340, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1701; Acts 1989, No. 285, § 1.

21-6-203. Commissioner of State Lands — Definition.

The Commissioner of State Lands may by rule:

(1)A fee under this section shall not be established in an amount that exceeds the costs expended by the Commissioner of State Lands in producing or filing deeds or performing services.

As used in subdivision (b)(1) of this section, “costs” means the actual costs expended by the Commissioner of State Lands plus three percent (3%) of the actual costs expended by the Commissioner of State Lands.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 117, §§ 1, 2, p. 295; C. & M. Dig., § 4570; Pope's Dig., § 5654; Acts 1983, No. 886, §§ 1, 3; 1985, No. 318, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-114, 10-115, 12-1704, 12-1705; Acts 2001, No. 423, § 1; 2019, No. 673, § 1.

Subchapter 3

— County Officers

21-6-301. Fees not basis for compensation.

Fees of the office shall not be the basis of compensation for officers or employees of county offices.

All compensation, including salary, hourly compensation, expense allowances, and other remunerations allowed to any county officer or employee shall be made only on specific appropriation by the quorum court of the county. The quorum court shall make those appropriations required by law.

All expense allowances and remunerations other than salary allowed to any county officer or employee by law shall be paid only for actual expenses incurred in the official performance of duties as attested by vouchers certified by the county officer or employee and by such other evidence as may be required.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 127, §§ 1, 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-1740, 12-1742, 12-1743.

21-6-302. County treasurers — Commission — Definition — Findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

Unless otherwise provided under subdivision (f)(1) of this section or subsection (g) of this section or under §6-13-701, §6-17-908, §6-20-221, §8-15-111, §14-90-913, §14-174-109, §14-284-403, or §19-5-1096, the county treasurers shall collect, as a treasurer's commission, two percent (2%) on all funds coming into their hands as treasurers and to be paid out of the respective funds.

The commissions collected under this section shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the county treasurer's commission fund.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 78, § 1; 1985, No. 558, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1728; Acts 1991, No. 257, § 1; 1999, No. 108, § 1; 2003, No. 844, § 1; 2005, No. 435, § 2; 2017, No. 420, § 1; 2019, No. 310, § 5.

21-6-303. County surveyors.

County surveyors shall be allowed the following fees:

For each day he or she may be engaged, either under an order of the county court, or otherwise, not to exceed$50.00

For each mile traveled from the place of residence to a place where the service is to be made and return .12

For calculating the amount of land in each tract or division and making the plat, a fee of not to exceed three dollars ($3.00) per hour devoted in the preparation thereof, but in no event less than1.00

For recording plat and certificate .50

For every copy of plat and certificate .50.

Cross References. Fees as county timber inspector, §15-32-410.

An agreement between county judge and surveyor that surveyor would receive the compensation in excess of statutory amount was unauthorized. Prairie County v. Radican, 174 Ark. 622, 296 S.W. 80 (1927) (decision prior to 1929 amendment).

History.

Acts 1875, No. 77, § 29, p. 167; 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 58, § 10, p. 103; C. & M. Dig., § 4596; Acts 1921, No. 224, § 1; 1929, No. 95, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 5684; Acts 1947, No. 201, § 1; 1957, No. 173, § 1; 1963, No. 192, § 1; 1971, No. 455, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1729.